North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-07 Pleadings In Civil Actions [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure and
transferred to other sections of the Code]

28-07-01.
Forms of pleading. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 8, 10.

28-07-02.
Complaint — What to contain. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 7, 8, 10.

28-07-03.
Joinder of causes of action. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 18.

28-07-04.
Demurrer or answer — Defendant’s only pleading — Time for interposing. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 7, 12.

28-07-05.
Joint demurrer and answer permitted. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 7.

28-07-06.
When defendant may demur. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 7, 12.

28-07-07.
Requisites of demurrer. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 7, 12.

28-07-08.
Grounds for demurring taken by answer, when. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 7, 12.

28-07-09.
Grounds for demurrer waived unless objection taken by demurrer or answer — Exception. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 7, 12.

28-07-10.
Requisites of answer. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 8.

28-07-11.
Offer of fixed damages may be served with answer, when — Effect if offer accepted. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 12.

28-07-12.
Effect if offer of fixed damages rejected. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 12.

28-07-13.
Sham defenses. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 12.

28-07-14.
Requisites of counterclaim. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 13.

28-07-15.
Several defenses or counterclaims may be contained in answer — How stated. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 8, 10.

28-07-16.
Reply or demurrer to counterclaim. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 7, 12.

28-07-17.
Reply to defense by way of avoidance. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 7.

28-07-18.
Demurrer to reply. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 7, 12.

28-07-19.
Supplemental pleading. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 15.

28-07-20.
Signing of pleading — Effect — Verification not required — Attorney subject to disciplinary action. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 11.

28-07-21.
Pleadings not evidence in criminal action. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

28-07-22.
Irrelevant matter may be stricken. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 12.

28-07-23.
Procedure when defendant’s name is unknown. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 9.

28-07-24.
Statement of account — Not necessary to plead — Demand for — Giving of — Effect of failure to give. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 12.

28-07-25.
Bill of particulars — More definite statement. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 12.

28-07-26.
Pleading a judgment. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 9.

28-07-27.
Procedure when judgment on same claim is obtained in another action during pendency of present action. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 15.

28-07-28.
Pleading conditions precedent. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 9.

28-07-29.
Pleading instrument for payment of money. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 8.

28-07-30.
Pleading private statute. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 9.

28-07-31.
Complaint in libel or slander. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 8.

28-07-32.
Answer in libel or slander. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 8.

28-07-33.
Answer to complaint for possession of property distrained doing damage. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 8.

28-07-34.
Pleading over if demurrer overruled. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 7, 12.

28-07-35.
Amendment of pleading after demurrer to it sustained — Separation of actions improperly joined. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 15.

28-07-36.
Amendment of pleadings as matter of course — Service of amended pleading. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 15.

28-07-37.
Time when amendment of pleading may be permitted — Nature of amendments allowable. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 15.

28-07-38.
Amended complaint — Service of — Time for answer — Default judgment on. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 15.

28-07-39.
Pleading or doing act after expiration of the time therefor permissible, when — Order enlarging time. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 6.

28-07-40.
Allegations deemed true or denied, when. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 8.

28-07-41.
Liberal construction of pleadings. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 8.

28-07-42.
Trivial defects in pleading or proceeding to be disregarded. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 1, 8.

28-07-43.
Variance material, when — Effect and proof of material variance. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 15.

28-07-44.
Immaterial variance — Effect of. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 15.

28-07-45.
Variance distinguished from failure of proof. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 15.